Alabama, session 2026rs, SB180.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 15-22-20, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§15-22-20
(a) There shall be a Board of Pardons and Paroles which
shall consist that consists of three members. The membership
of the board shall be inclusive and reflect the racial,
gender, geographic, urban/rural urban, rural, or and economic
diversity of the state. At least one member shall be a current
or former law enforcement officer with a minimum of 10 years'
experience in or with a law enforcement agency which that has
among its primary duties and responsibilities the
investigation of violent crimes or the apprehension, arrest,
or supervision of the perpetrators thereof.
(b) Any vacancy occurring on the board, whether for an
expired or unexpired term, shall be filled by appointment by
Page 1

expired or unexpired term, shall be filled by appointment by
SB180 Engrossed
the Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate, from
a list of five qualified persons nominated individuals
submitted by a board nominating committee consisting of the
Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House of
Representatives, and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.
The nominating board shall committee, as soon as practicable
after a vacancy occurs, whether for an expired or unexpired
term, shall meet and select by majority vote the names of five
persons individuals to be submitted to the Governor. The board
nominating committee shall immediately submit its nominations
to the Governor, who shall make his or her appointment from
the list within 10 days. Appointees shall begin serving
immediately upon appointment, until confirmed or rejected by
the Senate. Appointments made at times when the Senate is not
in regular session shall be effective ad interim. Any
appointment made by the Governor while the Senate is in
regular session must be submitted to the Senate not later than
the third legislative day following the date of the
appointment; any. Any appointment made while the Senate is not
in regular session shall be submitted not later than the third
legislative day following the reconvening of the Legislature
in regular session. If the Senate fails to vote on an
appointee's confirmation before adjourning sine die during the
regular session in which the appointee is appointed, the
appointee is deemed to be confirmed.
(c)(1) Members Beginning on October 1, 2026, new
members of the board shall be appointed for terms of six years
commencing on July 1 March 1. in the years 1953, 1955, and
Page 2

commencing on July 1 March 1. in the years 1953, 1955, and
SB180 Engrossed
1957, and The terms of the members serving on the board on
October 1, 2026, shall end on the last day of February
following the sixth year of their term.
(2) Members of the board shall serve until their
successors are appointed and qualified.
(3) Any person appointed to fill the vacancy for an
unexpired term shall vacate the office upon the expiration of
that unexpired term.
(d) The Governor shall designate one of the members as
chair, and the chair shall preside at sessions of the board.
(e) Each member shall take the constitutional oath of
office and shall be subject to impeachment for any of the
causes specified in Section 173 of the Constitution; and the
of Alabama of 2022. The procedure in cases of impeachment
shall be in the manner provided by Section 175 of the
Constitution; provided, however, that in the event of Alabama
of 2022. If the Governor shall determine determines that any
member of the board is incapacitated by reason of physical or
mental disability or illness to the extent that the member
cannot efficiently perform the duties of his or her office, he
or she shall direct the Attorney General to proceed to the
determination of that issue in an inquisition proceeding
instituted by him or her in the Circuit Court of Montgomery
County, Alabama. In the event the issue is determined in the
court against the board member, the court shall declare the
office vacant, and the same office shall be vacated, and a
successor appointed, as provided in this section.
(f) Two members of the board shall constitute
Page 3

(f) Two members of the board shall constitute
SB180 Engrossed
constitute a quorum for the transaction of the official
business of the board.
(g) The members of the board shall hold no other office
of profit during their incumbency.
(h) The annual compensation of the chair and each
associate member of the Board of Pardons and Paroles shall be
an amount as is provided by law. The salaries shall be paid in
equal installments from the State Treasury in the same manner
that salaries of other state officers are paid."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 4

1, 2026.
SB180 Engrossed


Senate
Read for the first time and referred ................20-Jan-26
100 to the Senate committee on Judiciary
101
102 Read for the second time and placed ................29-Jan-26
103 on the calendar:
104 1 amendment
105
106 Read for the third time and passed ................05-Feb-26
107 as amended
108 Yeas 34
109 Nays 0
110 Abstains 0
111
112
113 Patrick Harris,
114 Secretary.
115
Page 5